New Jersey, session 222, A1447.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.  A board of education may permit a student who attends a nonpublic school and meets the eligibility requirements for student athletes established by the New Jersey State Interscholastic Athletic Association to try out for, and participate in, a school-sponsored high school interscholastic athletics team or squad in the students district of residence in accordance with the same criteria established for students enrolled in the district if the nonpublic school does not sponsor a high school interscholastic athletics team or squad in the sport in which the student wishes to participate. b. Any controversy concerning a students compliance with the eligibility requirements for student-athletes established by the New Jersey State Interscholastic Athletic Association shall be adjudicated by the association in accordance with its constitution and by-laws.  A student who attends a nonpublic school and wishes to compete on a school-sponsored high school interscholastic athletics team or squad in the students resident district shall: (1) provide proof of residence in the district; and (2) meet the requirements for participation established by the school district for students enrolled in the district including, but not limited to, requirements regarding physical examinations, insurance, fees, age, and academics.  A nonpublic school student shall comply with the same standards of behavior, responsibilities, and performance as all other members of the team or squad. c.  A student who withdraws from a school district to enroll in a nonpublic school and who is ineligible to participate in interscholastic athletics at the time of withdrawal from the school district due to failure to meet academic, behavioral, or eligibility standards, shall be ineligible to compete in interscholastic athletic competition in accordance with the rules of the New Jersey State Interscholastic Athletic Association. d.   A board of education may charge a student who participates in a school-sponsored high school interscholastic athletics team or squad pursuant to this section, other than a student with financial hardship, a fee no greater than the actual cost per pupil of participating in the sport.  The criteria for determining financial hardship shall be the same as the Statewide eligibility standards established by the State Board of Education for free and reduced price meals pursuant to the State school lunch program. e.   Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school district to provide transportation services or pay transportation costs associated with a nonpublic school students participation in interscholastic athletics pursuant to the provisions of this section. f.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school district to change the schedules, procedures, or participation requirements of an interscholastic athletics team or squad to accommodate a nonpublic school student who wishes to participate in interscholastic athletics pursuant to the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.